California, session 20252026, AB2256.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) The radiologist assistant is an advanced-level radiographer who has completed a nationally recognized radiologists assistant educational program and successfully completed a nationally recognized certification examination for radiologist assistants.(b) Radiologist assistants are an extension of a radiologist and work under the supervision of a radiologist, as part of a radiologist-led team, performing medical imaging procedures within the scope of practice that the radiologist assistant is educationally prepared, clinically competent, and delegated by a radiologist to perform.(c) Radiologist assistants do not hold the responsibility of diagnosing illnesses; however, radiologist assistants assist a radiologist by completing patient history, describing procedures, performing medical imaging procedures, and communicating initial clinical and imaging observations or procedure details only to the supervising radiologist for the radiologist’s use.(d) Radiologist assistants work in hospitals, outpatient facilities, or diagnostic imaging centers. Radiologist assistants work only under the supervision and delegation of a radiologist.(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that this act be implemented using existing certification, registration, and enforcement mechanisms and will not require the department to establish a new licensure category, program, or regulatory framework.SEC. 2. Section 114876 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:114876. (a) No person shall hold themselves out to be a radiologist assistant, or use the title of “radiologist assistant,” or any other term, to imply or to suggest that the person is a radiologist assistant, unless the person meets all of the following requirements:(1) The person has passed the radiologist assistant examination administered by the American Registry of Radiologic Technologists, the radiology practitioner assistant examination administered by the Certification Board for Radiology Practitioner Assistants, or another examination offered by a successor or comparable entity that has been determined by the department to evaluate the knowledge and skills necessary to ensure the protection of the public and has been approved by the department.(2) The person maintains current registration with the American Registry of Radiologic Technologists, the Certification Board for Radiology Practitioner Assistants, or a successor or comparable entity.(3) The person is certified or permitted to conduct radiologic technology in this state or possesses a radiologist assistant license from another state that licenses radiologist assistants.(b) A radiologist assistant shall work only under the supervision of a radiologist. A radiologist assistant shall not function in their capacity as a radiologist assistant independent of a supervising radiologist.(c) A radiologist assistant shall not interpret images, make diagnoses, or prescribe medications or therapies.(d) A radiologist assistant may administer prescribed drugs only as directed by a supervising radiologist or their designee.(e) (1) A radiologist assistant may communicate and document initial clinical and imaging observations or procedures only to a radiologist for the radiologist’s use.(2) A radiologist assistant may communicate a supervising radiologist’s report to an appropriate health care provider consistent with the American College of Radiology guideline for communicating diagnostic imaging findings.(f) A supervising radiologist may delegate to a radiologist assistant, as the radiologist determines appropriate to the radiologist assistant’s competence, those tasks or services that a radiologist usually performs and is qualified to perform.(g) This section shall not be construed to eliminate, or in any way affect, any existing duties for a radiologic technologist or any existing requirements for the supervision of a radiologic technologist. Enforcement of this section shall be conducted using existing enforcement authority applicable to radiologic technologists and shall not require additional staff, rulemaking, or resources.(h) A violation of this section shall not constitute a misdemeanor under subdivision (a) of Section 107075.